Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 4. Employee Benefits
§ 27-14-403.
Awards generally; method of payment.

In addition to payment of medical and hospital care and artificial replacement, an injured employee and his dependents may be entitled to one (1) or more awards for:

Temporary total disability or temporary light duty;

Permanent partial impairment;

Permanent partial disability or vocational rehabilitation as provided under W.S.

27-14-408

;

Permanent total disability; or

Death.

Notwithstanding the date of death or the date of the determination of permanent total disability, in the case of permanent total disability or death, each child of an employee shall be paid two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per month for payments made after July 1, 2009, until the child dies or reaches the age of twenty-one (21) years, whichever first occurs, or if the child is physically or mentally incapacitated until the child dies unless qualified for and receiving benefits under the Medicaid home and community based waiver program. If the child is enrolled or preregistered in a post secondary educational institution including a four-year college, community college or private trade school licensed pursuant to W.S.

21-2-401

through

21-2-407

and providing career, technical or apprenticeship training, the child shall receive the amount provided by this section until the child attains the age of twenty-five (25) years. The amount awarded under this subsection shall be adjusted for inflation annually by the division, using the consumer price index or its successor index of the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, or three percent (3%), whichever is less.

All awards stated in this section except awards under paragraph (a)(i), subsection (b) and paragraphs (e)(ii), (iv) and (v) and (h)(ii) and subsection (k) of this section shall be paid monthly at the rates prescribed by this subsection. For permanent partial impairment under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, the award shall be calculated at the rate of two-thirds (2/3) of the statewide average monthly wage for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the quarterly period in which the benefits are first paid as determined pursuant to W.S.

27-14-802

. For temporary total disability under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the award shall be paid monthly at the rate of thirty percent (30%) of the statewide average monthly wage or two-thirds (2/3) of the injured employee’s actual monthly earnings at the time of injury, whichever is greater, but shall not exceed the lesser of one hundred percent (100%) of the injured employee’s actual monthly earnings at the time of the injury or the statewide average monthly wage for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the quarterly period in which the injury occurred as determined pursuant to W.S.

27-14-802

with one-half (1/2) of the monthly award paid on or about the fifteenth of the month and one-half (1/2) paid on or about the thirtieth of the month. For temporary light duty under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, the award shall be paid monthly at the rate of eighty percent (80%) of the difference between the employee’s light duty wage and the employee’s actual monthly earnings at the time of injury. For permanent partial and permanent total disability or death under paragraphs (a)(iii), (iv) and (v) of this section, the award shall be paid monthly computed as follows:

For those employees whose actual monthly earnings are less than seventy-three percent (73%) of the statewide average monthly wage, the award shall be ninety-two percent (92%) of the injured employee’s actual monthly earnings;

For those employees whose actual monthly earnings are equal to or greater than seventy-three percent (73%) of the statewide average monthly wage, but less than the statewide average monthly wage, the award shall be two-thirds (2/3) of the statewide average monthly wage;

For those employees whose actual monthly earnings are greater than or equal to the statewide average monthly wage, the award shall be two-thirds (2/3) of the employee’s actual monthly earnings, but the award shall be capped at and shall not exceed the statewide average monthly wage;

In the case of death due to work related causes, and if the award computed under paragraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subsection is less than eighty percent (80%) of the statewide average monthly wage, the award shall be adjusted to an amount not less than eighty percent (80%) of the statewide average monthly wage or seventy-five percent (75%) of the injured employee’s actual monthly earnings at the time of injury, whichever is greater. In no event shall the award exceed two (2) times the statewide average monthly wage for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the quarterly period in which the injury occurred as determined pursuant to W.S. 27-14-802;

Awards for permanent total disability shall be adjusted for inflation annually by the division, using the consumer price index or its successor index of the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the calendar year before the date of adjustment or three percent (3%), whichever is less. The adjustment provided by this paragraph shall apply to all awards for permanent total disability benefits in effect on or after July 1, 2009 using as the base for calculation the award in effect on that date or the first award, whichever is later. The adjustment shall become effective annually on July 1 and shall be applied to all awards for permanent total disability that were first made at least one (1) year before the effective date of the adjustment.

If an injured employee entitled to receive or receiving an award under paragraph (a)(ii), (iii) or (iv) of this section dies due to causes other than the work related injury, the balance of the award shall be paid:

To the surviving spouse;

If there is no surviving spouse or if the spouse remarries or dies, the balance of the award shall be paid to the surviving dependent children of the employee. Each surviving dependent child shall receive a share of the award in the proportion that the number of months from the death or remarriage until the child attains the age of majority, or if the child is physically or mentally incapacitated until the child attains the age of twenty-one (21) years, bears to the total number of months until all children will attain these ages;

If there is no surviving spouse or if the spouse remarries or dies and there are no dependent children or the children have attained the age of majority or twenty-one (21) if physically or mentally incapacitated, or die, the balance of the award shall be paid to a surviving parent of the employee if the parent received substantially all of his financial support from the employee at the time of injury. If two (2) remaining parents of the employee who received substantially all of their financial support from the employee at the time of the injury survive the employee, the balance of the award shall be divided equally between the two (2) parents;

Payment of the award shall cease:

If there is no surviving spouse, dependent children or dependent parents;

Upon remarriage or death of a spouse and there are no dependent children or dependent parents;

Upon the death of a dependent child as to payments to that child; and

Upon the death of a dependent parent as to payments to that parent.

If an injured employee dies as a result of the work related injury whether or not an award under paragraphs (a)(i) through (iv) of this section has been made:

All awards under paragraphs (a)(i) through (iv) of this section shall cease as of the date of death;

The burial expenses of the deceased employee shall be paid in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) together with an additional amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) to cover other related expenses, unless other arrangements exist between the employer and employee under agreement;

The surviving spouse shall receive for one hundred (100) months a monthly payment as provided by subsection (c) of this section. If the surviving spouse dies before the award is entirely paid or if there is no surviving spouse, the unpaid balance of the award shall be paid to the surviving dependent children of the employee in the manner prescribed by paragraph (d)(ii) of this section. If there are no dependent children, further payments under this paragraph shall cease as of the date of the spouse’s death;

In addition to any amount paid under paragraph (e)(iii) of this section, surviving children shall receive an award as provided by subsection (b) of this section;

If the employee died with no surviving spouse or dependent children but with one (1) surviving parent or two (2) surviving parents of the employee who received at least one-half (1/2) of his or their financial support from the employee at the time of injury, the surviving parent or parents shall receive a monthly payment as provided by subsection (c) of this section for sixty (60) months thereafter or until the parent or the survivor of them dies.

Awards to an employee or a spouse for permanent partial disability, permanent total disability or death may, upon application to the division with a showing of exceptional necessity and notice to the employer, be paid in whole or in part in a lump sum. In no event shall an award for permanent partial impairment under W.S.

27-14-405

be paid in a lump sum.

Following payment in full of any award, or if a lump sum settlement was made under subsection (f) of this section when the award would have been fully paid but for the lump sum settlement, to an employee for permanent total disability or to a surviving spouse for death of an employee, an additional award for extended benefits may be granted subject to the following requirements and limitations:

In the case of an employee:

A claim for compensation is filed by the employee or someone on his behalf;

The employee establishes a reasonable effort on his behalf has been made to return to part time or full time employment including retraining and educational programs;

The division in determining entitlement under this paragraph shall consider the amount of the monthly award made to an injured worker pursuant to W.S. 27-14-403(a)(iv), all earned income of the injured worker, all employment based retirement income of the injured worker, all income derived by the injured worker as a result of the injury, excluding mortgage or any other loan credit insurance, or any supplemental income insurance purchased by or on behalf of the employee and any periodic payments from any other governmental entity to the injured worker. The division shall not consider any other income received by the injured worker or members of the injured worker’s household;

The maximum monthly amount of additional compensation shall not exceed the amount provided in subsection (c) of this section;

The division may attach reasonable conditions to application for or receipt of awards under this subsection including retraining or educational programs and the award may be adjusted in accordance with fulfillment of the conditions;

The division may decrease an award to qualify an employee eligible for maximum benefits under any other state or federal pension plan;

Any award granted under this subsection shall not exceed twelve (12) months unless the division determines an award for a period exceeding twelve (12) months but not greater than four (4) years is appropriate.

In the case of a surviving spouse, upon application to the division and a showing of necessity, the division may award continued monthly payments to the spouse not to exceed one-third (1/3) of the statewide average monthly wage for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the quarter in which the injury occurred. An award granted under this paragraph shall not exceed twelve (12) months but may be renewed and shall cease at the time the spouse dies or remarries.

All awards to a minor or individual with a legal disability shall be paid:

To the legal guardian or conservator if one exists; or

As the division determines to be in the best interests of the minor or individual if there is no legal guardian or conservator.

As used in this section:

“Actual monthly earnings” means the injured employee’s actual monthly earnings at the time of injury excluding any payment for casual or unscheduled overtime and any fringe benefit;

“Overtime” means payments for work in excess of forty (40) hours per week;

“Statewide average monthly wage” means the statewide average monthly wage for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the quarterly period in which the injury occurred as determined pursuant to W.S.

27-14-802

.

Any injured worker who has or is receiving medical services entirely in Wyoming from a Wyoming health care provider shall be eligible if otherwise qualified for temporary total disability payments at the rate of seventy percent (70%) of the injured worker’s actual monthly earnings at the time of the injury but not to exceed one hundred and three percent (103%) of the statewide average wage for the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the quarterly period in which the injury occurred as determined pursuant to W.S.

27-14-802

, with the following exceptions:

If an injured worker is injured outside of Wyoming, the injured worker if otherwise qualified shall be eligible to receive temporary total disability payments at the rate provided in this subsection, provided the injured worker receives services entirely in Wyoming from a Wyoming health care provider after initial treatment following the injury;

An injured worker otherwise qualified for temporary total disability payments shall be eligible to receive temporary total disability payments at the rate provided in this subsection if the services or treatment by an out-of-state health care provider were rendered upon the instruction of the division; or

An injured worker otherwise qualified for temporary total disability payments shall be eligible to receive temporary total disability payments at the rate provided in this subsection if due to unavailability of medical services in Wyoming, the division provides written authorization, before or after treatment, to the injured worker to obtain the medical services from an out-of-state health care provider and the out-of-state health care provider agreed to accept as full payment the fees paid by the division pursuant to the division’s fee schedule. For purposes of this subsection, medical services shall be deemed unavailable in Wyoming if the distance from the injured worker’s residence to an in-state health care provider is at least one hundred (100) miles greater than the distance from the injured worker’s residence to an out-of-state medical provider;

An injured worker otherwise qualified for temporary total disability payments shall be eligible to receive temporary total disability payments at the rate provided in this subsection if the employer has a contractual agreement with an out-of-state health care provider.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 264, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 1998, ch. 117, § 1; 2001, ch. 75, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 10, § 1; 2004, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 32 § 1; 2009, ch. 156, § 1.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(i), added “or temporary light duty”; and in the introductory paragraph of (c), updated internal references and inserted the penultimate sentence.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 32, § 1, effective July 1, 2004, in (b) substituted “eighteen (18) years” for “majority” and added the second sentence; in (c), in the first sentence of (c), updated internal references and substituted “calculated” for “paid monthly,” and inserted “with one-half (1/2) of the monthly award paid on or about the fifteenth of the month and one-half (1/2) paid on or about the thirtieth of the month” following “determined pursuant to W.S.

27-14-802

”; and in (e)(i) substituted “(iv)” for (iii).”

This section is set out as directed by the legislative service office.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)” for “one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00)”, substituted “July 1, 2009” for “July 1, 2001”, substituted “twenty-one (21) years” for “eighteen (18) years”, and substituted “unless qualified for and receiving benefits under the Medicaid home and community based waiver program” for “or attains the age of twenty-one (21) years, whichever first occurs”, in the second sentence, inserted “post secondary” preceding “educational institution”, substituted “four-year college, community college or private trade school licensed pursuant to W.S. 21 2 401 through 21 2 407 and providing career, technical or apprenticeship training” for “post-secondary education institution”, and substituted “twenty-five (25)
years” for “twenty-one (21) years”, and in the third sentence, added “or three percent (3%), whichever is less” at the end; in the introductory language of (c), in the second sentence, substituted “in which the benefits are first paid” for “in which the injury occurred”, in the third sentence, inserted “thirty percent (30%) of the statewide average monthly wage or” following “at the rate of” and substituted “whichever is greater, but shall not exceed the lesser of one hundred percent (100%) of the injured employee's actual monthly earnings at the time of the injury or” for “but not to exceed”; in (c)(iv), added the provision beginning with “or seventy-five percent (75%)” at the end of the first sentence and added the second sentence; added (c)(v); in (e)(iii), substituted “one hundred (100) months” for “fifty-four (54) months” in the first sentence; in (e)(v), in the first sentence, inserted “or two (2) surviving parents” following “one (1) surviving parent”, substituted “at least one-half (1/2) of his or their financial support” for “substantially all of his financial support”, inserted “or parents” following “the surviving parent”, substituted “a monthly payment as provided by subsection (c) of this section for sixty (60) months” for “six hundred dollars ($600.00) the first month after the death and one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for thirty (30) months”, inserted “or the survivor of them” following “until the parent”, and deleted “whichever is less from the end”, and deleted the second sentence, which concerned payments to two surviving parents of persons without surviving spouses or children; in (k)(iii), added the last sentence; and added (k)(iv).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Receipt of benefits based on common-law marriage. —

A common-law marriage valid in the state in which contracted is valid in Wyoming for purposes of receipt of benefits under the worker's compensation laws. Jim's Water Serv. v. Eayrs, 590 P.2d 1346,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1979), limited, State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990); Bowers v. Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Workmen's Comp. Div., 593 P.2d 182,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1979).

But illegitimate child of deceased workman's wife not entitledto compensation. —

The illegitimate child of deceased workman's wife, neither acknowledged nor supported by decedent, does not qualify for death benefits under this section as decedent's stepchild. Smith v. National Tank Co., 350 P.2d 539,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1960).

Permanent total disability. —

A workers' compensation claimant's injury, for purposes of his new claim for permanent total disability and extended benefits, was deemed to have occurred when he was found to be permanently disabled. Rodgers v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 939 P.2d 246,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1997), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. July 8, 1997).

Temporary total benefits. —

Employee had an ascertainable loss where he had a poor prognosis and could not safely return to a physically demanding position, and he had reached maximum medical improvement unless he was willing to consider fusion surgery.
Phillips v. TIC-The Industrial Co. of Wyoming, Inc. (In re Phillips), 2005 WY 40, 109 P.3d 520,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2005).

Determining causation when death occurs. —

It is not necessary to determine whether the fatal injury, even if it is a second injury, occurred in the course and scope of employment, but rather, it is necessary to determine whether the injured employee (already injured by a work related injury) died as a result of the work related injury. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div. v. Bruhn, 951 P.2d 373,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1997), limited, Fisher v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safey & Compensation Division (In re Fisher), 2008 WY 89, 189 P.3d 866,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2008).

Where work-related injuries rendered decedent a paraplegic who died 12 years later from smoke inhalation after a fire at his home because his paraplegia rendered him unable to cough with sufficient force to expel mucus from his lungs, the supreme court of Wyoming held that his surviving spouse was entitled to receive death benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-403(e); but for the effects of his workplace injury, decedent most likely would have fully recovered from the smoke inhalation.
Fisher v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safey & Compensation Division (In re Fisher), 2008 WY 89, 189 P.3d 866,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2008).

Supreme court of Wyoming expressly rejects the “quasi-course of employment” theory of recovery for death benefits; in order for a second injury to be compensable, the original compensable injury must itself be the direct cause of the subsequent injury.
Fisher v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safey & Compensation Division (In re Fisher), 2008 WY 89, 189 P.3d 866,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2008).

Surviving spouse may maintain action for permanent disability.—

A surviving spouse of an employee, who suffers a compensable injury but who dies from causes other than the compensable injury before he has made a formal claim for permanent disability benefits, may maintain a separate action for permanent disability benefits. Cordova v. Holly Sugar Corp. (In re Cordova), 882 P.2d 880,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Wyo. 1994).

Death benefits preclude recovery for emotional distress. —

In providing death benefits articulated in this section, legislature subsumed entire prospect of recovery for death of an employee engaged in covered employment, and thus claim by survivors for intentional infliction of emotional distress was derivative of claim under Worker's Compensation Act and was properly dismissed. Anderson v. Solvay Minerals, Inc., 3 P.3d 236,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2000), overruled in part, Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18, 366 P.3d 521,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2016).

Initial burden on employee to show reasonable efforts madeto obtain suitable employment. —

In a hearing upon a claim for permanent total disability because of a back injury, in order to sustain his burden of proof, the employee had to show reasonable efforts were made to obtain suitable employment. As the employee testified that he had not attempted to work or to look for any work since his injury, he did not shift the burden of proof to the employer. Rose v. Westates Constr. Co., 703 P.2d 1084,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1985).

Subjective belief that injury makes employment search futilenot enough. —

Claimant's belief that his back injury and its accompanying pain would make his search futile was not enough to relieve him of the burden of showing reasonable efforts to secure employment, in view of evidence showing that there were a number of available jobs that one with his injury quite possibly could hold. Worker's Compensation Claim of Cannon v. FMC Corp., 718 P.2d 879,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 543

(Wyo. 1986).

Court properly concluded that employee's participation in horse-raising partnership corroborated supervisory skills

that the employee had acquired as a product of his police experience. Rose v. Westates Constr. Co., 703 P.2d 1084,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1985).

Injury “occurred” when physician's report mailed. —

Where, although a claimant may have known that his 1963 injury was the source of his medical difficulties as early as November 1986, but it was not until May 1988, when so informed by his examining physician, that he became aware that his injury (total disability) had “occurred,” pursuant to subsection (c), the injury occurred when the physician's report was mailed on May 2, 1988. In re Nielsen, 806 P.2d 297,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. Mar. 27, 1991).

Calculation based on time of injury. —

Where employee's income varied substantially from month to month the hearing examiner properly averaged employee's income to determine employee's temporary total disability benefits and excluded gratuities that were not reported to the government. However, where employee had worked three and one half months the examiner improperly divided the total income by four months. Goe v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div., 2002 WY 6, 38 P.3d 1063, Wyo. LEXIS 6 (Wyo. 2002).

Employee had actual monthly earnings at the time of injury within the meaning of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-403(c) where the employee had monthly earnings, which did not fluctuate widely from pay period to pay period but were consistent and fixed month after month at a specified hourly rate and number of hours per week, and thus the hearing examiner properly calculated the employee's benefits by applying the formula set out in the division's rules and regulations; answers to any questions about the claimant's work history and the longevity of his employment were speculative and irrelevant to the statutory framework of the worker's compensation law, which focuses on the circumstances at the time of the injury. Wilson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Wilson), 2003 WY 105, 75 P.3d 669,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 2003).

Substantiation required. —

Expenses claimed under the death benefits provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-403

(e)(ii) must be documented with receipts or other substantial evidence, and where the spouse had not substantiated a claim for a certain sum, the denial of her claim for an additional benefit of $ 2,500 to cover other unitemized funeral expenses was affirmed. Loberg v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Loberg), 2004 WY 48, 88 P.3d 1045,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 2004).

Calculation based on time of injury proper. —

Substantial evidence supported the hearing examiner's determination that temporary total disability benefits should be calculated based on the claimant's actual monthly earnings at the time of the accident. Bhutto v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 933 P.2d 481,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1997).

Extended benefits award. —

An employee may receive an extended benefits award up to the maximum amount permitted under subsection (c) in addition to all of the income received as specified in subsection (g)(i)(C); however, extended benefits are not limited to an amount adequate only for mere subsistence. In re Worker's Compensation Claim of Prasad, 11 P.3d 344,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 2000).

Benefits denied. —

Under this section, substantial evidence supported the denial of workers'
compensation benefits where a claimant's story regarding a back injury was inconsistent; moreover, the testimony of the claimant's doctor was disregarded since he was not given the correct medical history, and his opinions were based largely on what he was told by the claimant.
McIntosh v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2007 WY 108, 162 P.3d 483,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2007).

Additional benefits awarded based on state's average weeklywage at time of injury. —

The district court was correct in awarding a claimant additional benefits under former § 27-12-405(d)(iv) (now see subsection (g) of this section) based upon the state's average weekly wage at the time of the injury, and not the average weekly wage at the time of the application. In re Shapiro, 703 P.2d 1079,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 512

(Wyo. 1985).

Apportionment of benefits between 2 employers. —

The question of whether there should be an apportionment of total temporary disability benefits between two employers could not be considered as an issue where the trial court found that the employer had not shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the earlier injury sustained by the employee was an intervening cause in regard to the subsequent injury. Brad Ragan Tire Co. v. Gearhart Indus., 744 P.2d 1125,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 531

(Wyo. 1987).

Applying 1987 version of this section. —

Although worker's compensation division erroneously awarded employee extended benefits from 1992 through 1994 based on a 1985 statute, division was not barred by res judicata, collateral estoppel or judicial estoppel from applying 1987 version of this section to employee's 1995 claim. Ottema v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 968 P.2d 41,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1998).

1987 version of this section applied to employee's claim, where although his logging accident occurred in 1985, he first sought permanent total disability certification in 1990, visited a doctor in 1990 who found him permanently totally disabled, and applied for permanent total disability certification in 1991. Ottema v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 968 P.2d 41,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1998).

Retrospective award of extended benefits allowed. —

Under former law, where the statute was silent with regards to the availability of past payments, the rule of liberal construction was applied in favor of the employee, resulting in a retrospective award of extended benefits for permanent total disability. Wright v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 952 P.2d 209,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1998).

Applying 1987 version of this section. —

Finding in favor of claimant in a workers'
compensation action was appropriate pursuant to 1987 requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-403(g)(i)(C) because the Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division erred when it considered the claimant's wife's income as part of household income attributable to an employee; phrase “income of the claimant” necessarily restricted the subsequent types of income listed, including household income.
State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Johnson, 2008 WY 59, 185 P.3d 16,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2008).

Cited

in

Duncan v. Laramie County Community College, 768 P.2d 593,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1989); Whiteman v. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 987 P.2d 670,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1999); Osenbaugh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 10 P.3d 544,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2000); Moller v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 12 P.3d 702,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 211

(Wyo. 2000); Nagle v. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Nagle), 2008 WY 99, 190 P.3d 159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Aug. 19, 2008); Picozzi v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 86, 304 P.3d 977,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Jul 16, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workmen's compensation: posthumous children and children born after accident as dependents, 18 ALR3d 900.

Workers' compensation: incarceration as terminating benefits, 54 ALR4th 241.

Workers' compensation: reopening lump-sum compensation payment, 26 ALR5th 127.